Washington statutes.
RCW 19.105.440

Registration as salesperson—Application—Unprofessional conduct—Assurances of discontinuance—Renewal of registration—Support order, noncompliance.

(1) A salesperson may apply for registration by filing in a complete and readable form with the director an application form provided by the director that includes the following:

(a) A statement whether or not the applicant has been found to have engaged in any violation of any act designed to protect consumers and whether the applicant is qualified for licensure under RCW 18.235.130;

(b) A statement fully describing the applicant's employment history for the past five years and whether or not any termination of employment was the result of any theft, fraud, or act of dishonesty;

(c) A consent to service comparable to that required of operators under this chapter; and

(d) Required filing fees.

(2) In addition to the unprofessional conduct specified in RCW 18.235.130, the director may take disciplinary action against a camping resort salesperson's registration or application for registration under this chapter or the person's license or application under chapter 18.85 RCW for any of the following conduct, acts, or conditions:

(a) Violating any of the provisions of this chapter or any lawful rules adopted by the director pursuant thereto;

(b) Making, printing, publishing, distributing, or causing, authorizing, or knowingly permitting the making, printing, publication, or distribution of false statements, descriptions, or promises of such character as to reasonably induce any person to act thereon, if the statements, descriptions, or promises purport to be made or to be performed by either the applicant or registrant and the applicant or registrant then knew or, by the exercise of reasonable care and inquiry, could have known, of the falsity of the statements, descriptions, or promises;

(c) Knowingly committing, or being a party to, any material fraud, misrepresentation, concealment, conspiracy, collusion, trick, scheme, or device whereby any other person lawfully relies upon the work, representation, or conduct of the applicant or registrant;

(d) Continuing to sell camping resort contracts in a manner whereby the interests of the public are endangered, if the director has, by order in writing, stated objections thereto;

(e) Misrepresentation of membership in any state or national association; or

(f) Discrimination against any person in hiring or in sales activity on the basis of race, color, creed, or national origin, or violating any state or federal antidiscrimination law.

(3) The director, subsequent to any complaint filed against a salesperson or pursuant to an investigation to determine violations, may enter into stipulated assurances of discontinuances in lieu of issuing a statement of charges or a cease and desist order or conducting a hearing. The assurance shall consist of a statement of the law in question and an agreement not to violate the stated provision. The salesperson shall not be required to admit to any violation of the law, nor shall the assurance be construed as such an admission. Violation of an assurance under this subsection is grounds for disciplinary action.

(4) The director may by rule require such further information or conditions for registration as a camping resort salesperson, including qualifying examinations and fingerprint cards prepared by authorized law enforcement agencies, as the director deems necessary to protect the interests of purchasers.

(5) Registration as a camping resort salesperson shall be effective for a period of one year unless the director specifies otherwise or the salesperson transfers employment to a different registrant. Registration as a camping resort salesperson shall be renewed annually, or at the time of transferring employment, whichever occurs first, by the filing of a form prescribed by the director for that purpose.

(6) It is unlawful for a registrant of camping resort contracts to employ or a person to act as a camping resort salesperson covered under this section unless the salesperson has in effect with the department and displays a valid registration in a conspicuous location at each of the sales offices at which the salesperson is employed. It is the responsibility of both the operator and the salesperson to notify the department when and where a salesperson is employed, his or her responsibilities and duties, and when the salesperson's employment or reported duties are changed or terminated.

(7) The director shall immediately suspend the license or certificate of a person who has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order. If the person has continued to meet all other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension, reissuance of the license or certificate shall be automatic upon the director's receipt of a release issued by the department of social and health services stating that the licensee is in compliance with the order.

[ 2002 c 86 s 274; 1997 c 58 s 851; 1988 c 159 s 21; 1982 c 69 s 15.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.

Short title—Part headings, captions, table of contents not law—Exemptions and waivers from federal law—Conflict with federal requirements—Severability—1997 c 58: See RCW 74.08A.900 through 74.08A.904.

Effective dates—Intent—1997 c 58: See notes following RCW 74.20A.320.